Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-14,122
Commission;
field investigations and audits; purpose.

The
commission shall make random field investigations and audits with respect
to campaign statements and activity reports filed with the commission under the
Nebraska Political Accountability and Disclosure Act. Any audit
or investigation conducted of a candidate's campaign statements during a campaign
shall include an audit or investigation of the statements of his or her opponent
or opponents as well. The commission may also carry out field investigations
or audits with respect to any campaign statement, registration, report, or
other statement filed under the act if the commission or the executive director
deems such investigations or audits necessary to carry out the purposes of
the act.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 122;

Laws 1993, LB 587, § 18;

Laws 2013, LB79, § 26.